Massachusetts, session 194th, H670.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 1B of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the seventh paragraph the following
paragraph:-
The board shall annually publish a supplemental report containing student achievement
data for each approved private special education school or program, provided that such data shall
include student performance on the statewide assessment system approved by the board under
section 1I.
SECTION 2. Section 8 of chapter 70B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 24, the word “and”.
of 4

SECTION 3. Said section 8 of said chapter 70B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting in line 28, after the word “districts” the following:-
“; and (9) priority shall be given to projects needed in the judgment of said authority to
create space for in-district special education programs and services”
SECTION 4. Section 10 of said chapter 70B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting, in line 44, after the sentence ending in the word “construction”, the following new
sentence:-
“The authority shall award incentive points for projects that include spaces for in-district
special education programs and services, including special education programs and services
provided by education collaboratives pursuant to section 4E of chapter 40 for public school
districts within public school buildings.”
SECTION 5. Chapter 71B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10 the following new section:-
Section 10A. Each approved private special education school or program authorized
under this chapter to provide special education services to children, and that enrolls students
funded by the commonwealth or its political subdivisions, shall file annual reports with the
department of elementary and secondary education. Each approved private special education
school or program shall annually prepare, financial statements, including: (1) a statement of net
assets; (2) a statement of revenues, expenditures and changes in net assets; and (3) such
supplemental statements and schedules that may be required by the department. Each school
shall annually cause an independent audit to be made of its financial statements consistent with
the generally accepted governmental auditing standards. Each school shall file the audit report
of 4

and any related management letters annually on or before January 1, for the previous fiscal year
with the department and the state auditor, and shall submit a copy of the audit report and any
related management letters to each school district that enrolled students in said approved private
special education school during the period covered by the audit report.
The audited financial statements, accompanying notes and schedules shall disclose, but
not be limited to: (1) transactions between the approved private special education school and any
related for profit or non-profit organization; (2) transactions or contracts related to the purchase,
sale or lease of real property; (3) the names, duties and total compensation of the 5 most highly
compensated employees; (4) the amounts expended on administration and overhead; (5)
information on programs and services provided by the school, including the cost effectiveness of
such programs and services; and (6) any other items that may be required by regulation.
SECTION 6. The department of early education and care and the department of
elementary and secondary education may share data only for residential programs approved by
both departments.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of
education shall, in consultation with the department of elementary and secondary education, the
department of early education and care, and the operational services division, study and make
recommendations regarding the oversight of Approved Massachusetts Day and Residential
Private Special Education Programs.
The recommendations shall provide information on topics including, but not limited to:
(1) best practices of licensing, monitoring and providing oversight of Approved Massachusetts
Day and Residential Private Special Education Programs (Chapter 766 schools); (2) the
of 4

collection of data related to providing appropriate educational programming; (3) the collection of
data related to providing the most appropriate services to students in chapter 766 schools; (4)
consideration of the relevant aspects of the statute governing education collaboratives, as defined
in section 4E of Chapter 40, and their potential application to chapter 766 schools; and (5) the
collection of data relevant to the structure for congregate care for the students and review of the
appropriate agency placement policies.
In developing recommendations, the secretary of education, the department of elementary
and secondary education, the department of early education and care, and the operational
services division shall consult with and solicit input from various persons and groups, including
but not limited to, the department of developmental services; the division of local services, the
executive directors of chapter 766 schools of varying size and scope throughout the
commonwealth; organizations representing individuals with developmental disabilities; district
directors of special education throughout the commonwealth; organizations representing children
with disabilities and their parents; and associations representing special education administers
and other educational administers, school officials, and municipal officials.
The secretary of education shall file findings containing recommendations, including
legislation and regulations necessary to carry out the recommendations, with the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate not later than 12 months following the passage of this act.
of 4